Washington statutes.
RCW 19.80.025

Changes in registration—Filing notice of change.

(1) A notice of change must be filed with the department when a change occurs in:

(a) The true and real name of a person conducting a business with a trade name registered under this chapter; or

(b) Any mailing address set forth on the registration or any subsequently filed notice of change.

(2) A notice of cancellation must be filed with the department when use of a trade name is discontinued.

(3) A notice of cancellation, together with a new registration, must be filed before conducting or transacting any business when:

(a) An addition, deletion, or any change of person or persons conducting business under the registered trade name occurs; or

(b) There is a change in the wording or spelling of the trade name since initial registration or renewal.

[ 2011 c 298 s 15; 2000 c 174 s 3; 1984 c 130 s 5.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Intent—Agency transfer—Contracting—Effective date—2011 c 298: See notes following RCW 19.02.020.

Effective date—1984 c 130: See note following RCW 19.80.001.